Colorado, session 2026A, HB1061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-572 as
follows:
39-22-572. Federal low-income housing tax credit ceiling set
aside for community integration housing - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THERE IS A SIGNIFICANT UNMET NEED IN COLORADO FOR
INTEGRATED, AFFORDABLE HOUSING FOR PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL
AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES;
(b) THE DEVELOPMENT OF COMMUNITY-BASED HOUSING THAT
-2- HB26-1061

COMPLIES WITH FEDERAL HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
SETTINGS REQUIREMENTS (COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING) IS VITAL
TO MEETING THIS NEED AS WELL AS THE STATE'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER
FEDERAL LAW; AND
(c) ESTABLISHING AN ALLOCATION PRIORITY FOR COMMUNITY
INTEGRATION HOUSING TO RECEIVE FEDERAL LOW-INCOME HOUSING TAX
CREDITS THROUGH A QUALIFIED ALLOCATION PLAN WILL ENCOURAGE AND
SUPPORT DEVELOPMENTS TO ADDRESS THIS SPECIFIC HOUSING NEED.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COLORADO HOUSING AND FINANCE
AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION 29-4-704.
(b) "CASE MANAGEMENT AGENCY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 25.5-6-1702 (2).
(c) "COMMUNITY-CENTERED BOARD" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 25.5-6-1702 (5).
(d) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND FINANCING.
(e) "FEDERAL TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE FEDERAL LOW-INCOME
HOUSING TAX CREDIT PROVIDED BY SECTION 42 OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE THAT IS ALLOCATED BY THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO A
COMPETITIVE PROCESS ESTABLISHED IN THE QUALIFIED ALLOCATION PLAN.
(f) "FEDERAL TAX CREDIT CEILING" MEANS THE AGGREGATE
DOLLAR AMOUNT OF FEDERAL TAX CREDITS THAT THE AUTHORITY MAY
ALLOCATE FOR ANY CALENDAR YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42
(h)(3)(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(g) "HCBS SETTINGS RULE" MEANS THE FEDERAL REGULATORY
-3- HB26-1061

REQUIREMENTS FOR ANY HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
SETTING SET FORTH IN 42 CFR 441.301(c)(4).
(h) "HCBS WAIVER SERVICES" MEANS THE HOME- AND
COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES ALLOWED TO BE FURNISHED IN
NON-INSTITUTIONAL, COMMUNITY SETTINGS AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO
INSTITUTIONAL CARE PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396n(c).
(i) "PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25.5-10-202 (26).
(j) "QUALIFIED ALLOCATION PLAN" MEANS THE QUALIFIED
ALLOCATION PLAN ADOPTED BY THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SECTION
42 (m) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(k) "QUALIFIED COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT" MEANS A "QUALIFIED LOW-INCOME HOUSING PROJECT", AS
THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 42 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE,
THAT IS:
(I) LOCATED IN COLORADO; AND
(II) DETERMINED BY THE AUTHORITY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS
FOR COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4)(b)
OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL SET ASIDE NOT LESS THAN TEN PERCENT
OF THE ANNUAL FEDERAL TAX CREDIT CEILING FOR ALLOCATION TO
QUALIFIED COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING DEVELOPMENTS, AS
DEFINED IN SUBSECTION (2)(k) OF THIS SECTION; EXCEPT THAT, ANY
AMOUNT OF CREDIT SET ASIDE FOR QUALIFIED COMMUNITY INTEGRATION
HOUSING DEVELOPMENTS REMAINING AFTER THE RANKING OF PROJECTS
BUT PRIOR TO THE FINAL ALLOCATION CYCLE OF ANY CALENDAR YEAR
-4- HB26-1061

SHALL BE AVAILABLE FOR ALLOCATION TO ANY ELIGIBLE PROJECT.
(4) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, THE AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE ELIGIBILITY FOR A CREDIT
AND ALLOCATE CREDITS SET ASIDE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE QUALIFIED ALLOCATION PLAN.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ALLOCATE A CREDIT SET ASIDE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ONLY TO PROPOSED DEVELOPMENTS
DETERMINED BY THE AUTHORITY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT, TO HAVE MET THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS FOR
COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING:
(I) DESIGN, DEVELOPMENT, AND OPERATION IN COMPLIANCE WITH
THE HCBS SETTINGS RULE, AND ANY SUCCESSOR PROVISIONS, AS WELL AS
ANY RELATED STATE STATUTES OR REGULATIONS;
(II) RESERVATION OF AT LEAST TWENTY PERCENT OF THE
RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNITS FOR OCCUPANCY BY PERSONS WITH
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, WITH TENANT
SELECTION POLICIES FOR SUCH RESERVED UNITS THAT PROVIDE PRIORITY,
TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, TO PERSONS WITH
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR
HCBS WAIVER SERVICES ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(III) FORMAL PARTNERSHIP, EVIDENCED BY A WRITTEN
AGREEMENT, WITH A COMMUNITY-CENTERED BOARD OR A CASE
MANAGEMENT AGENCY CERTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO:
(a) REQUIRE THE ALLOCATION OF A FEDERAL TAX CREDIT TO A
DEVELOPMENT THAT DOES NOT COMPLY WITH SECTION 42 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OR THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS IN THE
-5- HB26-1061

QUALIFIED ALLOCATION PLAN; OR
(b) PROHIBIT A COMMUNITY INTEGRATION HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
FROM COMPETING FOR FEDERAL TAX CREDITS OUTSIDE THE SET ASIDE
ESTABLISHED BY SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-2102, add
(8.5) as follows:
39-22-2102. Credit against tax - affordable housing
developments - legislative declaration.
(8.5) (a) IN ADMINISTERING THE CREDIT ALLOWED BY SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PROVIDE PRIORITY SCORING
OR PREFERENCE IN THE COMPETITIVE EVALUATION OF APPLICATIONS FOR
THE CREDIT TO A QUALIFIED DEVELOPMENT THAT:
(I) HAS BEEN ALLOCATED A FEDERAL TAX CREDIT SET ASIDE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-22-572 AS A QUALIFIED COMMUNITY
INTEGRATION HOUSING DEVELOPMENT; AND
(II) CONTINUES TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR COMMUNITY
INTEGRATION HOUSING SET FORTH IN SECTION 39-22-572 (4)(b).
(b) THE PRIORITY SCORING OR PREFERENCE REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (8.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST BE IMPLEMENTED THROUGH
THE AUTHORITY'S APPLICATION SCORING CRITERIA OR SELECTION
PRIORITIES AND DOES NOT REQUIRE THE ALLOCATION OF A CREDIT TO A
QUALIFIED DEVELOPMENT THAT FAILS TO MEET ALL OTHER ELIGIBILITY,
UNDERWRITING, OR FEASIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.
(c) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (8.5) LIMITS THE AUTHORITY OF
THE AUTHORITY TO DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOCATED
TO ANY OWNER OF QUALIFIED DEVELOPMENT OR TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE
WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS.
-6- HB26-1061

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to any qualified application plan for federal
tax credits adopted by the authority on or after the applicable effective
date of this act.
-7- HB26-1061